California statutes. Water Code
Notwithstanding anything in this division to the contrary, if the board of supervisors finds that protests have been made, prior to the close of the hearing for the formation of the district, by the owners of real property within the proposed district the assessed value of which as shown by the last equalized assessment roll constitute more than one-half of the district’s assessed value of the real property within the proposed district or by the owners of more than one-half of the total acreage within the proposed district, the proceedings shall terminate.

(History: Added by Stats. 1965, Ch. 500.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 4. Election [55180. - 55187.]

55180.

Unless the board of supervisors proceeds pursuant to Section 55161, the board of supervisors shall, by ordinance or resolution adopted at a regular or special meeting after having acquired jurisdiction to proceed in the formation of a district, provide for and order the holding of a special election in the proposed district to submit to the qualified voters thereof the proposition of forming the district and incurring a debt by the issuance of bonds of the district for the purposes set forth in the petition for the formation of the district, if a bonded indebtedness is to be incurred.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1957, Ch. 285.)
-------------------------------------------

55181.

The ordinance or resolution calling the special election shall also recite the objects and purposes for which any proposed indebtedness is to be incurred, the estimated cost of the proposed improvement, the amount of the principal of the indebtedness to be incurred therefor, and the rate of interest to be paid on the indebtedness, and shall fix the date on which the special election shall be held, the manner of holding it, and the manner of voting for or against the proposition.

(History: Added by Stats. 1953, Ch. 155.)
-------------------------------------------

55182.

If a statement is made in the formation petition that taxes shall be levied upon the land within the district and upon no other property, the board of supervisors shall recite the statement in any resolution, ordinance, or order adopted or entered pursuant to this chapter.

(History: Added by Stats. 1953, Ch. 155.)
-------------------------------------------

55183.

For the purposes of the election, the board of supervisors shall, in the ordinance or resolution, establish one or more precincts within the boundaries of the proposed district, designate a polling place, and appoint one inspector, one judge and one clerk for each precinct.

(History: Added by Stats. 1953, Ch. 155.)
-------------------------------------------

55184.

The ordinance or resolution ordering the holding of the election shall, prior to the date set for the election, be published pursuant to Section 6066 of the Government Code in a newspaper of general circulation printed and published in the county and designated by the board of supervisors for that purpose, and shall be posted in three of the most public places in the proposed district at least 10 days prior to the date set for the election. No other notice of the election need be given.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1957, Ch. 357.)
-------------------------------------------

55184.1.

Within five days after the district formation election has been called, the legislative body which has called the election shall transmit, by registered mail, a written notification of the election call to the executive officer of the local agency formation commission of the county or principal county in which the territory or major portion of the territory of the proposed district is located. Such written notice shall include the name and a description of the proposed district, and may be in the form of a certified copy of the resolution adopted by the legislative body calling the district formation election.

The executive officer, within five days after being notified that a district formation election has been called, shall submit to the commission, for its approval or modification, an impartial analysis of the proposed district formation.

The impartial analysis shall not exceed 500 words in length and shall include a specific description of the boundaries of the district proposed to be formed. 

The local agency formation commission, within five days after the receipt of the executive officer’s analysis, shall approve or modify the analysis and submit it to the officials in charge of conducting the district formation election.

(History: Added by Stats. 1970, Ch. 736.)
-------------------------------------------

55184.2.

The board of supervisors or any member or members of the board authorized by the board, or any individual voter or bona fide association of citizens entitled to vote on the district formation proposition, or any combination of such voters and associations of citizens, may file a written argument for or a written argument against the proposed district formation.

Arguments shall not exceed 300 words in length and shall be filed with the officials in charge of conducting the election not less than 54 days prior to the date of the district formation election.

(History: Added by Stats. 1970, Ch. 736.)
-------------------------------------------

55184.3.

If more than one argument for or more than one argument against the proposed district formation is filed with the election officials within the time prescribed, such election officials shall select one of the arguments for printing and distribution to the voters.

In selecting the arguments, the election officials shall give preference and priority in the order named to the arguments of the following:

(a) The board of supervisors or any member or members of the board authorized by the board.

(b) Individual voters or bona fide associations of citizens or a combination of such voters and associations.

(History: Added by Stats. 1970, Ch. 736.)
-------------------------------------------

55184.4.

The officials in charge of conducting the election shall cause a ballot pamphlet concerning the district formation proposition to be voted on to be printed and mailed to each voter entitled to vote on the district formation question.

The ballot pamphlet shall contain the following in the order prescribed:

(a) The complete text of the proposition.

(b) The impartial analysis of the proposition prepared by the local agency formation commission.

(c) The argument for the proposed district formation.

(d) The argument against the proposed district formation.

The election officials shall mail a ballot pamphlet to each voter entitled to vote in the district formation election at least 10 days prior to the date of the election. The ballot pamphlet is “official matter” within the meaning of Section 13303 of the Elections Code.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1994, Ch. 923, Sec. 256.   Effective January 1, 1995.)
-------------------------------------------

55185.

In all particulars not recited in the ordinance or resolution, the election shall be held as provided by law for holding general elections in the county.

(History: Added by Stats. 1953, Ch. 155.)
-------------------------------------------

55186.

If at the election a majority of the votes cast are in favor of the formation of the district and the incurring of the bonded indebtedness, if any is proposed, the board of supervisors shall enter an order to that effect upon its minutes, declaring the district formed, and the board may thereupon issue bonds of said district for the amount specified in the proceedings, payable out of funds of the district, provided as prescribed in this division.

(History: Added by Stats. 1953, Ch. 155.)
-------------------------------------------

55186.5.

The county clerk of the county shall immediately file with the Secretary of State a certificate listing:

(a) The name of the district.

(b) The date of formation.

(c) The county in which the district is located, and a description of the boundaries of the district, or reference to a map showing such boundaries, which map shall be attached to the certificate, or reference to the county recorder’s office where a description of such boundaries has been recorded.

If the order declaring the district formed contains all of the information required to be in the certificate, the county clerk may file a copy of the order in lieu of the certificate.

(History: Added by renumbering Section 55187 by Stats. 1963, Ch. 2132.)
-------------------------------------------

55187.

All acts and proceedings heretofore or hereafter taken by or on behalf of a county waterworks district for the formation of a district or for the annexation to an existing district and for the authorization, issuance, sale, or exchange of bonds of the district or for the annexed territory may be confirmed, validated, and declared legally effective in the manner provided in this section.

The board may instruct the clerk of the board to mail a notice to all owners of property within the county waterworks district, as their names and addresses appear on the last equalized county assessment roll, or as known to the clerk. Such notice shall include the name of the district, the date the district was ordered formed or the date of the annexation to an existing district, the amount of bonds authorized, and a statement that, commencing with the date of mailing of said notice there shall be a 60-calendar-day period during which period any property owner may file an action contesting the validity of the district’s formation, the annexation to an existing district or the bond authorization. The clerk shall make and file, with the board a certificate of mailing of the notices. The board may order the clerk to include such other additional information that it deems pertinent.

If no action is filed during the 60-day period, the district’s formation or the annexation to an existing district and the bond authorization are valid and uncontestable.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1969, Ch. 356.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 5. Formation of Zones With Formation of District [55200. - 55203.]

55200.

A separate petition for the formation of a zone or zones within a proposed district for any of the purposes specified in Section 55650 may be presented to the board of supervisors at the same time and in conjunction with a formation petition.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1965, Ch. 394.)
-------------------------------------------

55201.

The petition for the formation of a zone or zones and the proceedings thereon shall be in conformity with and subject to the provisions of Article 6, Chapter 2, Part 4 of this division, and except as otherwise provided, the proceedings shall be conducted and regarded as separate and distinct from proceedings upon the petition for formation of the district.

(History: Added by Stats. 1953, Ch. 155.)
-------------------------------------------

55202.

The board of supervisors may direct that notice of hearing, hearing, notice of election, or election upon the formation and zone petitions shall be consolidated and combined into one notice of hearing, one hearing, one notice of election, or one election; except that the requirements of this division with respect to the proceedings upon each of the petitions shall be complied with.

(History: Added by Stats. 1953, Ch. 155.)
-------------------------------------------

55203.

The formation of a zone or zones pursuant to this chapter shall in no event be effective for any purpose unless and until the district is established; but the nonformation of a proposed zone or zones for whatever reason shall in no way affect the formation of the district or of other proposed zones within the district.

(History: Added by Stats. 1953, Ch. 155.)
-------------------------------------------



PART 3. POWERS AND PURPOSES [55300. - 55408.]



  CHAPTER 1. Governing Body [55300. - 55311.]

55300.

The powers of the district enumerated in this division shall, except as therein otherwise provided, be exercised by the board.

(History: Added by Stats. 1953, Ch. 155.)
-------------------------------------------

55301.

The board of supervisors of the county is the governing board of the district unless a board of directors has been appointed under the provisions of this chapter as they existed prior to their repeal at the 1967 Regular Session of the Legislature. Each member of an appointed board of directors in existence on the effective date of the amendment of this section at the 1967 Regular Session of the Legislature shall continue to serve at the pleasure of the board of supervisors of the county, rather than for the term for which he was appointed.

Where the district becomes a subsidiary district of a city pursuant to the District Reorganization Act of 1965, the city council of such city is the governing board of the district, as provided in Section 56539 of the Government Code. If, on the date the district becomes a subsidiary district of a city, there is an appointed board of directors, such appointed board of directors is automatically dissolved as of that date. The term “board of supervisors,” as used in this division, shall in regard to any such district which has become a subsidiary district of a city, refer to the city council of such city.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1971, Ch. 674.)
-------------------------------------------

55302.

The board of supervisors of the county may, at any time, dissolve any board of directors governing any district, and thereafter the board of supervisors shall serve as the governing board of the district.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1967, Ch. 839.)
-------------------------------------------

55305.

(a) The board of directors may fix the compensation of its members for their services as directors not to exceed ten dollars ($10) for each meeting attended, not exceeding two meetings in any calendar month. If allowed by the board, a director shall also receive for performing duties for the district other than attending board meetings the following:

 (1) An amount not to exceed one hundred dollars ($100) for each day performing such duties.

 (2) Traveling and other expenses incurred by him or her in performing his duties.

(b) For purposes of this section, the determination of whether a director’s activities on any specific day are compensable shall be made pursuant to Article 2.3 (commencing with Section 53232) of Chapter 2 of Part 1 of Division 2 of Title 5 of the Government Code. Reimbursement for these expenses is subject to Sections 53232.2 and 53232.3 of the Government Code.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2005, Ch. 700, Sec. 35.   Effective January 1, 2006.)
-------------------------------------------

55307.

Any board of directors in existence on the effective date of the amendment of this section at the 1967 Regular Session of the Legislature succeeds to and has all the powers conferred upon the board of supervisors in reference to the waterworks district. Except as provided in Section 55302, the board of supervisors shall have no further jurisdiction except the appointment of the board of directors.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1967, Ch. 839.)
-------------------------------------------

55308.

The board of directors shall appoint a clerk who shall perform all of the duties pertaining to the district required to be performed by the clerk of the board of supervisors and such other duties as may be imposed upon him by the board of directors. The clerk shall receive such compensation as the board of directors shall determine and shall serve at the pleasure of the board. No director shall be eligible to the position of clerk.

(History: Added by Stats. 1953, Ch. 155.)
-------------------------------------------

55309.

The board of a district in existence on the effective date of this section shall file a certificate with the Secretary of State on or before January 1, 1964, listing:

(a) The name of the district.

(b) The date of formation.

(c) The county in which the district is located, and a description of the boundaries of the district, or reference to a map showing such boundaries, which map shall be attached to the certificate, or reference to the county recorder’s office where a description of such boundaries has been recorded.

If the order declaring the district formed contains all of the information required to be in the certificate, the board may file a copy of the order in lieu of the certificate.

(History: Added by Stats. 1963, Ch. 457.)
-------------------------------------------

55310.

Notwithstanding the provisions of Section 55301, the Board of Supervisors of Madera County may appoint a board of directors to serve as the governing board of Madera County Waterworks District #2. A determination by the board of supervisors to appoint a board of directors shall be made following a public hearing at a regular meeting of the board. In the event the board of supervisors determines to appoint a board of directors, it shall appoint five directors for the district, and each director shall serve at the pleasure of the board of supervisors. Any appointed board of directors succeeds to and has all the powers conferred upon the board of supervisors in reference to the Madera County Waterworks District #2. Except as provided in Section 55302, the board of supervisors shall have no further jurisdiction except for the appointment of directors.

(History: Added by Stats. 1982, Ch. 243, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

55310.2.

(a) Notwithstanding Section 55301, the Board of Directors of the Mendocino County Waterworks District #2 shall be elected. The elected board of directors shall act as the governing board of the district.

(b) There shall be five members of the board who shall be elected at large throughout the district. The directors shall be residents of the district at the time of election and shall remain residents throughout their term. Failure to maintain residency shall cause the director to vacate the office. The directors shall serve four-year terms. The election of directors shall be held by the all-mailed ballot procedure pursuant to Division 4 (commencing with Section 4000) of the Elections Code on the date described in Section 1500 of the Elections Code.

(c) Elections for the directors shall be conducted by the county clerk or by another election officer designated by the Mendocino Board of Supervisors. The district shall be responsible for the cost of the district elections.

(d) Unless otherwise provided or required by this section, Part 4 (commencing with Section 10500) of Division 10 of the Elections Code shall apply to the conduct of the district election.

(e) Any vacancy on the board, other than upon the expiration of a term, shall be filled by a majority vote of the directors. However, no vacancy shall be filled by less than three members’ affirmative votes. If the board fails to fill a vacancy within 60 days of the vacancy or if the membership of the board is less than four, the Mendocino County Board of Supervisors may appoint members to fill the vacancies. Appointed members shall serve until the next district election at which time the remainder of the unexpired term shall be filled at that election in the manner provided in this section.

(f) Directors shall be elected without reference to districts and, except for the filling of unexpired terms, without reference to a specific directorship. All candidates for open seats, except for the filling of unexpired terms, shall appear on the same ballot. Voters shall be allowed to vote for the number of candidates equal to the open seats; that number of candidates equal to the number of open seats that receive a plurality shall be elected. Write-in votes shall be counted, provided that the write-in candidate shall have complied with the requirements of subdivision (d) pertaining to the filing of a nomination form and signatures with the county clerk no less than 14 days prior to the election.

(g) Directors duly elected and certified at the first election shall assume office on July 1, 1996. The two-year terms shall expire on June 30, 1998. The first four-year terms shall expire on June 30, 2000. All subsequent terms shall expire on the last day of June in even-numbered years.

(h) Directors shall receive no compensation for service, except as permitted under Section 55305, but may be reimbursed only for necessary and actual expenses. Regulations governing reimbursement may be adopted by the board.

(i) Effective July 1, 1996, the elected Mendocino County Waterworks District #2 Board of Directors shall succeed to and have all the powers previously conferred upon the board of supervisors and the appointed board of directors in reference to this district.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2012, Ch. 132, Sec. 4.   (SB 1188)   Effective January 1, 2013.)
-------------------------------------------

55311.

When a district is a subsidiary district of a city, the city council may, by resolution, change the name of the district. The change of name shall be effective upon the filing of a certified copy of the resolution with the Secretary of State and the recording of a certified copy in the office of the county recorder of the county or counties in which the district is situated.

(History: Added by Stats. 1982, Ch. 243, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 2. General Powers [55330. - 55339.]

55330.

A district may provide for the supplying of the inhabitants of the district with water for irrigation, domestic, industrial, or fire protection purposes, through facilities of the district or other facilities, including but not limited to facilities of private water companies, mutual water companies, and private water systems within the district, and may provide for the development and conservation of water supplies for those purposes.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1959, Ch. 681.)
-------------------------------------------

55331.

The district may do all things necessary or proper to accomplish the purposes of this division.

(History: Added by Stats. 1953, Ch. 155.)
-------------------------------------------

55332.

The district may appoint or employ and prescribe the authorities and duties of a general manager, auditor, treasurer, and other officers, employees, attorneys, and engineers necessary or convenient for the business of the district, each of whom shall serve at the pleasure of the board.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1971, Ch. 674.)
-------------------------------------------

55333.

The district may adopt and enforce all rules, regulations and ordinances which may be necessary and proper for:

(a) The administration and government of the district.

(b) The acquisition, purchase or construction and use and operation of the waterworks, property and other facilities of the district.

(c) All other purposes of the district not in conflict with laws of this State.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1957, Ch. 2393.)
-------------------------------------------

55333.5.

A district may destroy a record pursuant to Chapter 7 (commencing with Section 60200) of Division 1 of Title 6 of the Government Code.

(History: Added by Stats. 2005, Ch. 158, Sec. 42.   Effective January 1, 2006.)
-------------------------------------------

55334.

Any violation of a regulation or ordinance of a district is a misdemeanor punishable by fine not to exceed one thousand dollars ($1,000), or imprisonment not to exceed six months, or both.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1983, Ch. 1092, Sec. 415.   Effective September 27, 1983.   Operative January 1, 1984, by Sec. 427 of Ch. 1092.)
-------------------------------------------

55335.

A district may acquire and conserve water supplies from any available source, including underground water basins within the same county, imported supplies, streams, waste water and storm water.

A district may acquire, purify, treat and reclaim saline water or sewage or both; may store, distribute, and sell the water and byproducts resulting from such purification, treatment and reclamation; and may acquire, construct and maintain pipelines, flumes, ditches, reservoirs, sewage purification plants, sewage collection systems, saline water demineralization plants, and such other works and facilities as are necessary or convenient to carry out these powers.

(History: Added by Stats. 1959, Ch. 681.)
-------------------------------------------

55335.5.

A district may construct, maintain, and operate sewage collection and treatment facilities and dispose of the effluent therefrom in any lawful manner and also do all things necessary or proper to accomplish such powers.

(History: Added by Stats. 1965, Ch. 394.)
-------------------------------------------

55336.

Subject to Section 56133 of the Government Code, a district may sell water to any person, firm, public or private corporation, public agency, or other consumer outside the district when the governing body finds that the district has a surplus of water above that which is required by the consumers within the district. Additionally, a district may sell water to any person, firm, public or private corporation, public agency, or other consumer outside the district when the governing body finds that the sale of the water is required in response to an emergency as defined in Section 1102 of the Public Contract
 Code.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2009, Ch. 332, Sec. 90.1.   (SB 113)   Effective January 1, 2010.)
-------------------------------------------

55337.

A district may construct, maintain, improve, and operate recreational facilities in connection with any dams, reservoirs, or other works owned or controlled by the district. A district may prescribe reasonable rules and regulations to govern the use of the recreational facilities and may fix and assess reasonable charges for the use of the recreational facilities by members of the public. Revenues from such charges may be expended for the following purposes:

(a) To pay the operating and maintenance expenses of the recreational facilities.

(b) To pay the interest on any bonded or other debt for the recreational facilities.

(c) To provide a sinking or other fund for the payment of the principal of any bonded or other debt for the recreational facilities as it becomes due.

(d) To provide a reasonable surplus for improvements, extensions, and enlargements of the recreational facilities.

This section shall be applicable only to districts located within Ventura County.

(History: Added by Stats. 1972, Ch. 138.)
-------------------------------------------

55338.

(a) The Department of Corrections and the Los Angeles County Waterworks District No. 4 shall enter into a contract for the district to meet the operational needs of the California State Prison—Los Angeles County for water, to be supplied to the district by the Antelope Valley-East Kern Water Agency. 

(b) The Department of Corrections shall use the water supplied to it by the Los Angeles County Waterworks District No. 4 pursuant to subdivision (a) as its primary source of water and shall use the Antelope Valley groundwater basin only as a supplementary source of drinking water or as an emergency backup supply. 

(c) Division 13 (commencing with Section 21000) of the Public Resources Code does not apply to any action undertaken pursuant to subdivision (a) or (b).

(History: Added by Stats. 1991, Ch. 1117, Sec. 1.   Effective October 14, 1991.)
-------------------------------------------

55339.

A district may contract with any state agency to finance any district improvement if the term of the contract does not exceed 30 years. A contract between the district and a state agency that creates an indebtedness or liability that exceeds the district’s annual revenue shall be repaid with revenue derived from the imposition of standby charges pursuant to Section 55501.5.

(History: Added by Stats. 2000, Ch. 722, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 2001.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 4. Property [55370. - 55378.]

55370.

A district may acquire property by purchase, gift, devise, exchange, descent, and eminent domain. The title to all property which may have been acquired for a district shall be vested in the district.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1970, Ch. 441.)
-------------------------------------------

55371.

The board may sell, exchange, or lease any property, or any interest in property, of the district, real or personal, if the board determines that the property is no longer needed for the uses of the district.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2009, Ch. 332, Sec. 90.2.   (SB 113)   Effective January 1, 2010.)
-------------------------------------------

55371.5.

If the board determines that the property is needed for the uses of another county waterworks district governed by the same board or another public agency with a service area or jurisdictional boundary that overlaps the district, the property, or an interest in the property, may be sold, exchanged, or leased to that district or public agency at its reasonable market value without notice.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2009, Ch. 332, Sec. 90.3.   (SB 113)   Effective January 1, 2010.)
-------------------------------------------

55372.

If the board determines the value of the property, or interest in the property, to be of a value of five thousand dollars ($5,000) or less, or is being leased for one year or less, it may be sold, exchanged, or leased without notice.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2009, Ch. 332, Sec. 90.4.   (SB 113)   Effective January 1, 2010.)
-------------------------------------------

55373.

If the board determines the property, or interest in the property, to have a value of more than five thousand dollars ($5,000) or is being leased for more than one year, a notice of time and place of sale or leasing shall be given by posting three notices in three public places within the district five days before the date of sale or leasing. At the time fixed for the sale or leasing, bids shall be received and the board may sell or lease to the highest bidder or may reject any or all bids.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2009, Ch. 332, Sec. 90.5.   (SB 113)   Effective January 1, 2010.)
-------------------------------------------

55374.

Whenever any portion of the territory of a district shall be annexed to, or otherwise included within any one municipal corporation which owns works for supplying its inhabitants with water, the board may lease to the municipal corporation, for periods not exceeding five years, the portion of the district’s distributing system that is in the portion of the district annexed to or included in the municipal corporation.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1955, Ch. 1615.)
-------------------------------------------

55375.

The municipal corporation may use the leased distributing system for the purpose of distributing water directly to individual consumers, with the same power of regulating the service of water, and of charging and collecting for the service, as if the leased distributing system were part of the municipally owned water plant.

(History: Added by Stats. 1953, Ch. 155.)
-------------------------------------------

55376.

The board shall, in the lease, reserve the right to use the leased distributing system, for the benefit of that portion of the district not annexed to or included in the municipal corporation, to the extent that the leased system is essential to the efficient operation of the balance of the system.

(History: Added by Stats. 1953, Ch. 155.)
-------------------------------------------

55377.

Any improvement provided for in this division may be located, constructed and maintained in, along, or across any public road or highway, or publicly owned right of way in the county, in such manner as to afford security for life and property; but the board shall restore, or cause to be restored, the road or highway, or publicly owned right of way to its former state, as near as may be, or in a sufficient manner not to have impaired unnecessarily its usefulness.

(History: Added by Stats. 1953, Ch. 155.)
-------------------------------------------

55378.

The board of supervisors of any county which employs a purchasing agent may authorize the purchasing agent to sell or dispose of any personal property of the district no longer needed for the uses of the district, pursuant to Section 25505 of the Government Code. Where such authorization is given, the provisions of Sections 55371, 55372, and 55373 shall not apply.

(History: Added by Stats. 1953, Ch. 1059.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 5. Use of the Improvement Act of 1911 [55385. - 55408.]



  ARTICLE 1. Authorization to Use Improvement Act of 1911 [55385. - 55386.]

55385.

Whenever in the opinion of the governing body of a county waterworks district the public interest and necessity require, it may order the formation of an improvement district for the purpose of constructing any authorized improvement within the boundaries of said waterworks district.

(History: Added by Stats. 1955, Ch. 452.)
-------------------------------------------

55386.

The district shall be formed, the work or improvement done, and the cost thereof assessed and collected in accordance with the provisions of the Improvement Act of 1911.

(History: Added by Stats. 1955, Ch. 452.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 2. Terms and Definitions [55400. - 55408.]

55400.

For the purposes of this chapter the following terms used in the Improvement Act of 1911 shall mean and include that which this article states each means and includes.

(History: Added by Stats. 1955, Ch. 452.)
-------------------------------------------

55401.

“City” means and includes county waterworks district.

(History: Added by Stats. 1955, Ch. 452.)
-------------------------------------------

55402.

“City council” or “legislative body” means and includes the governing body of the county waterworks district.

(History: Added by Stats. 1955, Ch. 452.)
-------------------------------------------

55403.

“Clerk” means and includes the secretary of the governing body of the county waterworks district.

(History: Added by Stats. 1955, Ch. 452.)
-------------------------------------------

55404.

“Council chambers” means and includes the place designated by the governing body of the county waterworks district for holding its regular meetings.

(History: Added by Stats. 1955, Ch. 452.)
-------------------------------------------

55405.

“Treasurer” means and includes the county treasurer.

(History: Added by Stats. 1955, Ch. 452.)
-------------------------------------------

55406.

“Superintendent of streets” or “streets superintendent” means and includes the county surveyor.

(History: Added by Stats. 1955, Ch. 452.)
-------------------------------------------

55407.

“Right of way” means and includes any parcel of land through which a right of way has been granted to the county waterworks district for any purpose.

(History: Added by Stats. 1955, Ch. 452.)
-------------------------------------------

55408.

All references to municipal officers and matters mean and include the corresponding officers of county waterworks districts and matters under this division.

(History: Added by Stats. 1955, Ch. 452.)
-------------------------------------------



PART 4. FINANCIAL PROVISIONS [55500. - 55720.]



  CHAPTER 1. General Provisions [55500. - 55507.]

55500.

The board may control and order the expenditure of tax revenues, secured to pay the cost and expenses of maintaining, operating, extending and repairing the district’s waterworks, for that purpose.

(History: Added by Stats. 1953, Ch. 155.)
-------------------------------------------

55501.

The board may fix and collect rates or charges for the use and supply of water furnished by the system, and to apply the receipts from the rates or charges to the expenses of the administration and government of the district and the use, operation and extension of the waterworks and water supply.

The revenues obtained from such rates or charges may be in lieu of or supplemental to revenues obtained by the levy of taxes.

The district board may provide for the collection of the charges for services rendered in the current or immediately preceding fiscal year as a part of the annual general county tax bill provided the district furnishes, on or before August 10, in writing to the board of supervisors and to the county auditor the description of each parcel for which a charge is to be billed together with the amount of the charge applicable to each parcel. The parcel description may be the parcel number assigned by the county assessor to the parcel. In such case the charge shall become a lien against the parcel of land to which it is charged in the same manner as the county general taxes. Penalties may be collected for late payment of the charge or the amount thereof unpaid in the manner and at the same rates as that applicable for late payment or the amount thereof unpaid of county general taxes. All laws applicable to the levy, collection and enforcement of municipal ad valorem taxes shall be applicable to such charges, except that if any real property to which such lien would attach has been transferred or conveyed to a bona fide purchaser for value, or if a lien of a bona fide encumbrancer for value has been created and attaches thereon, prior to the date on which the first installment of such taxes would become delinquent, then the lien which would otherwise be imposed by this section shall not attach to such real property and the charges relating to such property shall be transferred to the unsecured roll for collection.

If the district collects charges through the county general tax bill, the amount of the charge and any applicable penalty shall be stated on the tax bill separately from all other taxes, if practicable.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1981, Ch. 713, Sec. 10.)
-------------------------------------------

55501.1.

Any water service standby or immediate availability charge which remains unpaid for a period of 60 or more days after the date upon which they were billed may be collected thereafter by the county as provided herein.

(a) Once a year the board shall cause to be prepared a report of delinquent fees. The board shall fix a time, date and place for hearing the report and any objections or protests thereto.

(b) The board shall cause notice of the hearing to be mailed to the landowners listed on the report not less than 10 days prior to the date of the hearing.

(c) At the hearing the board shall hear any objections or protests of landowners liable to be assessed for delinquent fees. The board may make such revisions or corrections to the report as it deems just, after which, by resolution, the report shall be confirmed.
